Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.350

Lessees or assignees.

A lessee or contracting party under a sale contract or loan agreement shall not be required to be the eventual user of a nonprofit facility if any sublessee or assignee assumes all of the obligations of the lessee or contracting party under the lease, sale contract, or loan agreement, but the lessee or contracting party or their successors shall remain primarily liable for all of its obligations under the lease, sale contract, or loan agreement and the use of the nonprofit facility shall be consistent with the purposes of this subchapter.

[ 1990 c 167 s 7.]